Utah statutes.
59-12-1705.   Project selection using the written prioritization process --
Report.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (4), in determining priorities and
funding levels of projects to be funded by the revenues a county will receive
from a tax under this part, the council of governments shall use the weighted
criteria system adopted in the written prioritization process under Section
59-12-1704 to create a priority list of regionally significant transportation
facility projects as described in Subsection 59-12-1703(5).
(2)  Prior to finalizing priorities and funding levels of projects, the
council of governments shall conduct a public meeting on:
(a)  the written prioritization process; and
(b)  the merits of the projects that will be prioritized under this section.
(3)  The council of governments shall make the weighted criteria system
ranking for each project publicly available prior to the public hearings held
under Subsection (2).
(4) (a)  If the council of governments prioritizes a project over another
project with a higher rank under the weighted criteria system, the council of
governments shall identify the change at a meeting held under this section on
the merits of prioritizing the project above higher ranked projects.
(b)  The council of governments shall make the reasons for the prioritization
under Subsection (4)(a) publicly available.
